Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.460

Alternative direct petition method—Method is alternative.

The method of annexation provided for in RCW 35.13.410 through 35.13.450 is an alternative method, and does not supersede any other method.

[ 2003 c 331 s 7.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—2003 c 331: See notes following RCW 35.13.410.